Georgia, session 2025_26, SB103.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Part 1 of Article 3 of Chapter 5 of Title 50 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated,
relating to general authority, duties, and procedure of the Department of Administrative
Services, is amended by adding a new Code section to read as follows:
"50-5-84.3.
(a) As used in this Code section, the term:
(1) 'Company' means any sole proprietorship, organization, association, corporation,
partnership, joint venture, limited partnership, limited liability partnership, limited
liability company, or other entity or business association, including all wholly owned
S. B. 103
- 1 -

LC 46 0952
subsidiaries, majority owned subsidiaries, parent companies, or affiliates of such entities
or business associations, that exists for the purpose of making profit.
(2) 'Government of Iran' means the Islamic Republic of Iran.
(3) 'Scrutinized company' means any company owned or operated by the government of
Iran.
(b) A scrutinized company shall be ineligible to, and shall not, bid on or submit a proposal
for a contract with a state agency for goods or services.
(c) A state agency shall require a company that submits a bid or proposal with respect to
a contract for goods or services to certify that the company is not a scrutinized company.
(d) If the Department of Administrative Services determines that a company has submitted
a false certification under subsection (c) of this Code section:
(1) The company shall be liable for a civil penalty in an amount that is equal to the
greater of $250,000.00 or twice the amount of the contract for which a bid or proposal
was submitted;
(2) The state agency or the Department of Administrative Services shall terminate the
contract with the company; and
(3) The company shall be ineligible to, and shall not, bid on a state contract."
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
S. B. 103
- 2 -